New Jersey, session 221, A4393.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established in the Department of the Treasury a special fund to be known as the New Jersey Family Homelessness Fund. b.    Each taxpayer shall have the opportunity to indicate on the taxpayers New Jersey gross income tax return that a portion of the taxpayers refund or an enclosed contribution shall be deposited into the special fund. c.     Any costs incurred by the Division of Taxation for collection or administration attributable to this section may be deducted from receipts collected pursuant to this section, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  The State Treasurer shall deposit net contributions collected pursuant to this section into the New Jersey Family Homelessness Fund. d.    The Legislature shall annually appropriate all monies deposited into the New Jersey Family Homelessness Fund established pursuant to this section for distribution to the Family Promise national organization for allocation to each of the independently-run local affiliates operating in the State of New Jersey to support New Jersey families at risk for or experiencing homelessness, including homelessness prevention services, emergency shelter services, and housing stabilization services. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 next following the date of enactment.